Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 12

Operation of Railroads

65-12-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-101 (Acts 1907, ch. 390, § 2; Shan., § 3059a22; mod. Code 1932, § 5397; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1201; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 29), concerning depots, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 19, § 1, effective April 11, 2003.

65-12-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-102 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2420; mod. Code 1932, § 4007; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1202), concerning requirement that railroad provide schedules, passenger and freight services, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-103. Payment of fare required.

If any passenger refuses to pay the required fare, the conductor may put such passenger off the cars at any station or convenient point where the passenger can step on land.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2421; Code 1932, § 4008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1203.

Cross-References. Trespassing on railroad car, penalty, §§ 39-14-405, 39-14-406.

65-12-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-104 (Acts 1949, ch. 84, §§ 2-4; C. Supp. 1950, § 5398.1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1204; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 29), concerning discontinuance of passenger services, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-105 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2421; Code 1932, § 4008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1203), concerning preferential freight contracts, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-106 (Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 28; 1907, ch. 390, § 3; Shan., § 3059a65; Code 1932, § 5441; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1205; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 29), concerning unjust discrimination, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-107 (Code 1858, §§ 1170, 1171 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 48, §§ 35, 36); Shan., §§ 1578, 1579; Code 1932, §§ 2632, 2633; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1206, 65-1207), concerning stopping for transfer of baggage and freight, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-108. Precautions required for prevention of accidents.

In order to prevent accidents upon railroads, the following precautions shall be observed:

The officials having jurisdiction over every public road crossed by a railroad shall place at each crossing a sign, marked as provided by § 65-11-105. The county legislative body shall appropriate money to defray the expenses of the signs. The failure of any engine driver to blow the whistle or ring the bell at any public crossing so designated by either the railroad company or the public official shall constitute negligence with the effect and all as set forth in § 65-12-109;

On approaching every crossing so distinguished, the whistle or bell of the locomotive shall be sounded at the distance of one fourth (¼) of a mile from the crossing, and at short intervals until the train has passed the crossing;

Every railroad company shall keep the engineer, fireman, or some other person upon the locomotive, always upon the lookout ahead; and when any person, animal, or other obstruction appears upon the road, the alarm whistle shall be sounded, the brakes put down, and every possible means employed to stop the train and prevent an accident; and

It is unlawful for any person operating a railroad to use road engines without having them equipped with an electric light placed on the rear of the engine, tank, or tender, which light shall be a bull's eye lens of not less than four inches (4") in diameter with a bulb of not less than sixty (60) watts power, so that such road engine can be operated with safety when backing and the light so placed shall be burning while any such engine may be used in any backing movement. Such lights shall be operated at night; and any person violating any of these provisions shall be fined the sum of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and not more than one hundred dollars ($100), for each offense.

Code 1858, § 1166 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 94, §§ 1, 5-9; 1857-1858, ch. 44, § 3); Shan., § 1574; impl. am. Acts 1921, ch. 41, § 2; Acts 1925, ch. 133, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 2628; Acts 1959, ch. 130, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1208; Acts 1982, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References. Automatic signals at crossings, § 65-11-113.

Duty with respect to livestock on track, § 65-12-114.

Highway crossings, construction and maintenance, §§ 65-11-107 — 65-11-113.

Incline railroads, §§ 65-18-104, 65-18-105.

Reward for apprehension of persons obstructing tracks, § 40-8-102.

Tracks not to obstruct travel on highways, streets, and alleys, § 65-6-122.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, §§ 12-15, 17; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 217; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, §§ 12, 13, 39; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, §§ 10, 11; 19 Tenn. Juris., Negligence, §§ 6, 16, 20; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, §§ 29-32, 34, 37, 41-43, 46; 23 Tenn. Juris., Street Railroads, § 6; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 43.

Law Reviews.

Torts—The Occupied Crossing Doctrine-Determining Contributory Negligence As a Matter of Law in Railroad Accident Cases, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 435 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. A county is required to reimburse various municipalities within the county for the entire expenses the cities have incurred in erecting railroad crossing signs, and such reimbursements should be from the county's general fund, since the county highway commission has no authority over those roads, OAG 01-066, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (4/30/01).

Under existing law, remote-controlled locomotives are authorized in Tennessee, OAG 04-022, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (2/11/04).

65-12-109. Violation of § 65-12-108 is negligence per se.

A violation of § 65-12-108 by any railroad company constitutes negligence per se and in the trial of any causes involving § 65-12-108, the burden of proof, the issue of proximate cause, and the issue of contributory negligence shall be tried and be applied in the same manner and with the same effect as in the trial of other negligence actions under the common law in Tennessee.

Code 1858, § 1167 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 94, § 9); Shan., § 1575; Code 1932, § 2629; Acts 1959, ch. 130, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1209.

Cross-References. Aggravated assault, § 39-13-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 14, 15; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles and Other Vehicles, § 12; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, §§ 10, 11; 19 Tenn. Juris., Negligence, § 16; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, §§ 29, 35, 37, 42, 47, 50.

Law Reviews.

Railroads — Precautions Act — Effect of 1959 Amendment, 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 437 (1961).

65-12-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-12-110 (Acts 1870-1871, ch. 49, § 1; Shan., § 1583; Code 1932, § 2647; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1211), concerning the provision of bell rope for passenger trains, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 2, effective April 2, 1997.

65-12-111. Full stop at crossings.

Every engine or train shall be brought to a full stop before crossing a railroad which intersects at grade the road upon which it runs.

When the intersecting roads are under the management of the same company, this section shall not apply to engines and trains run upon the longer road.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

This section shall not apply where such other railroad is disconnected by interlocking switches placed on both roads, and at a safe distance from, and on each side of, the railroad crossing, such interlocking switches to be according to the present state of the art, and kept in good order and repair.

Acts 1871, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1877, ch. 114, § 1; 1899, ch. 100, § 1; Shan., §§ 1580-1582a1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 2634-2637; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1212 — 65-1215; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 44.

65-12-112. Track motor cars.

Every person, firm or corporation operating or controlling any railroad running through or within this state shall:

Provide each of its track motor cars when used during the period from thirty (30) minutes before sunset to thirty (30) minutes after sunrise with a permanently installed or portable electric light of such construction and with such candle power as to render visible at a distance of three hundred feet (300') in advance of such track motor car any track obstruction, landmark, warning sign or grade crossing and shall also provide each such track motor car when so used with a red light for use on the rear thereof with sufficient candle power as to be visible at a distance of three hundred feet (300'); and

Equip each of its track motor cars with a windshield and a device for cleaning rain and snow therefrom so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the operator of such track motor car.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation, operating or controlling any railroad running through or within this state, to operate or use any track motor car from thirty (30) minutes before sunset to thirty (30) minutes after sunrise, which is not equipped with lights of candle power and other equipment as provided in this section.

Any person, firm or corporation operating or controlling any railroad running through or within this state using or permitting to be used on its line in this state a track motor car in violation of this section commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day's violation is a separate offense.

Acts 1949, ch. 180, §§ 2-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 2670.9-2670.11 (Williams, § 2670.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1216 — 65-1218; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 29.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-12-113. Wires strung over railroad tracks.

Any person engaged in any business whereby wires are used for the transmission of intelligence or other purposes shall not string any wire or wires across railroad tracks without first having complied with the regulations of the department of transportation, prescribed to prevent accidents from such wires.

The department of transportation shall, after hearing all interested persons, prescribe and promulgate regulations for the construction and maintenance of wires across the tracks of railroads for the protection of trains, engines, cars, and the operatives thereof; provided, that the department of transportation's power is limited to regulation and the right to cross railroad tracks must be obtained by such wire-using companies according to law.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Any person failing to construct or reconstruct and maintain its wire or wires as provided in this section shall be liable for all damages both to railroad companies and their employees resulting therefrom.

Acts 1921, ch. 171, §§ 1, 3-5; Shan. Supp., §§ 1599a1, 1599a3-1599a5; Code 1932, §§ 2667-2670; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1219 — 65-1222; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 29.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-12-114. Standard of care required when livestock on tracks.

Whenever livestock appears on the tracks as an obstruction ahead of a railroad train, it shall be the duty of the engineer, or the person in charge of the operation of the train, to blow the alarm whistle and apply the brakes, in order to prevent, if reasonably possible, the striking of the livestock.

Acts 1961, ch. 126, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-1231.

Law Reviews.

Torts — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Dix W. Noel), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1409 (1961).

65-12-115. Locomotive operator must carry engineer's operator permit.

Every person who operates a railroad locomotive in this state shall carry on such operator's person while operating such locomotive an engineer's operator permit.

Acts 1980, ch. 542, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-1232.

Cross-References. Issue of license to operate a railroad locomotive, § 65-6-134.

Proof of identity shown to law enforcement officers, § 55-10-116.